Connecticut, session 2026, HB05413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Armed forces" has the same meaning as provided in section 27-
103 of the general statutes.
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs.
(3) (A) "Dental services" includes (i) preventive and diagnostic
services, such as biannual examinations and prophylaxis, (ii) restorative
services, such as fillings, root canals and crowns, (iii) prosthetics, such
as partial and complete dentures, and (iv) oral surgery, such as
extractions.
(B) "Dental services" does not include (i) dental implants, (ii) fixed
bridges, (iii) orthodontics, (iv) cosmetic services, such as whitening or
veneers, or (v) telehealth services.
LCO No. 2289 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5413
(4) "Department" means the Department of Veterans Affairs.
(5) "Eligible veteran" means any veteran who (A) is a resident of the
state, (B) has a service-connected disability rating of less than one
hundred per cent and is not receiving dental care from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, and (C) has a household income at or
below four hundred per cent of the federal poverty level.
(6) "Provider" means a dental practice, dental clinic or person licensed
to practice dentistry or dental medicine in the state.
(7) "Veteran" has the same meaning as provided in section 27-103 of
the general statutes.
(b) There is established a Veterans Dental Care Access Program, to be
administered by the department, for the purpose of assisting eligible
veterans with receiving dental services from providers that participate
in such program. The commissioner shall consult with a state-wide
organization that represents licensed dentists to identify any such
providers willing to participate in such program, and shall coordinate
with such organization in administering such program and
implementing the provisions of this section.
(c) On and after January 1, 2027, any eligible veteran may submit an
application to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, for assistance through the program established in
subsection (b) of this section. Not later than ten days after receipt of any
such application, the commissioner shall verify whether the applicant
satisfies all criteria for program eligibility and shall notify such
applicant of the commissioner's determination as to approval or
rejection of such application. Any such approval shall be for two years,
after which an applicant may reapply pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection.
(d) Not later than thirty days after an approval under subsection (c)
of this section, the commissioner shall refer the eligible veteran to a
LCO No. 2289 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5413
participating provider for the purpose of scheduling an appointment to
establish or continue, as applicable, dental care and to develop a
treatment plan for such eligible veteran. The provider shall set forth in
such treatment plan the dental services recommended for the eligible
veteran and shall submit such treatment plan to the commissioner for
review. Not later than ten days after receipt of a treatment plan, the
commissioner shall approve or modify such treatment plan and notify
the provider of such approval or modification. A provider may provide
dental services to an eligible veteran only after such notification and
only in accordance with such approval or modification.
(e) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
not later than five days after the provision of dental services to an
eligible veteran, a provider shall invoice the department for such dental
services. Not later than thirty days after receiving such invoice, the
department shall remit payment to the provider for such dental services,
subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection, and shall
advise such provider of the eligible veteran's status with regard to the
maximum annual benefit described in said subdivision.
(B) If an eligible veteran has coverage under a health insurance plan
for any of the dental services provided under subsection (d) of this
section, the provider shall invoice the health insurer for such dental
services and may only invoice the department for the remaining balance
on such dental services after exhausting all such coverage.
(2) The amount of dental services received by an eligible veteran for
which the department may remit payment under subparagraph (A) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not exceed three thousand five
hundred dollars per calendar year. If an eligible veteran receives dental
services in a calendar year in an amount that exceeds three thousand
five hundred dollars, the commissioner shall refer such eligible veteran
to the state-wide organization described in subsection (b) of this section
to explore alternative sources of funds to address such excess amount.
LCO No. 2289 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5413
(f) Not later than January 15, 2030, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner, in consultation with a state-wide organization that
represents licensed dentists, shall submit a report on the performance of
the Veterans Dental Care Access Program, and any recommendations
for improvement thereof, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to veterans'
and military affairs and public health, in accordance with the provisions
of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 2. Section 27-128 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Governor may transfer, from time to time, as may be found
expedient, including for purposes of the administration of the Veterans
Dental Care Access Program established in section 1 of this act, moneys
existing in the Soldiers, Sailors and Marines Fund and moneys
appropriated to the Department of Veterans Affairs from one of said
funds to the other of said funds.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 27-128